Massachusetts, session 194th, H3006.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 59 of the general laws is hereby amended by inserting after section 38, as
appearing in the 2018 official edition, the following section:-
Section 38 1/2 In a city or town that accepts this section, the assessed valuation of real
property owned by a person who has occupied said property for 30 years, shall be set at the
valuation of the property pursuant to section 38 in the thirtieth year of domicile; provided,
however, that said owner's income shall not exceed 100 percent of the area median income as
determined by the federal Department of Housing and Urban Development; and provided
further, that said owner shall not have more than $100,000 in liquid assets, excluding the value
of their domicile. Said valuation shall not increase unless and until the real property is sold or
transferred.
of 1